Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.020

Definitions.

The term "secretary" wherever used in this chapter shall mean the secretary of health of the state of Washington. The term "apprentice" wherever used in this chapter shall mean a person who shall be designated an apprentice in the records of the secretary at the request of a physician, registered optometrist, or licensee hereunder, who shall thereafter be the primary supervisor of the apprentice. The apprentice may thereafter receive from a physician, registered optometrist, or licensee hereunder training and direct supervision in the work of a dispensing optician.

[ 1995 c 178 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 74; 1979 c 158 s 37; 1957 c 43 s 2.]